Maine, session 132, LD983.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1727, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Service of notice of restricted person status. A law enforcement agency may
request that a hospital provide access to a person who is receiving care in the hospital for
the purpose of notifying the person that the person is a restricted person as defined in Title
34-B, section 3862-A, subsection 1, paragraph K.
A. The hospital shall provide the law enforcement agency with an opportunity to notify
the person under this subsection at a time the hospital determines is clinically
appropriate with due consideration to the medical condition of the person.
B. A hospital may disclose that the person is a patient to facilitate notice under this
subsection regardless of patient consent or confidentiality restrictions under hospital
policy.
Page 1 - 132LR0730(03)